Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 5 State Commission on Compensation

45-7-90.
Creation; purpose.

A State Commission on Compensation is established for the purpose of assisting the General Assembly in setting the compensation of constitutional state officers, including members of the General Assembly and full-time heads of state agencies, authorities, boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, and departments whose compensation is set by the Constitution, by law, or by Act of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202, effective May 9, 2017, reenacted this Code section without change.

45-7-91.
Composition; qualifications, appointment, vacancies of members.

As used in this article, the term “commission” means the State Commission on Compensation.

The commission shall be composed of seven members who shall serve for terms of four years and until their successors shall have been appointed and qualified. No person shall be qualified for appointment to office as a member of the commission if he or she is an officer or employee of the state at the time of his or her selection for appointment nor shall such officer’s or employee’s spouse, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or the spouse of such individuals be qualified for such appointment. Three members shall be appointed by the Governor, at least one of whom shall be regularly engaged in the field of business finance or business management. Two members shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor. Two members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Should any vacancy on the commission occur from death, resignation, or otherwise, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor member to serve during the unexpired term.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 103, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, added subsection (a); designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsections (b) and (c); in subsection (b), substituted “seven members” for “12 members” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, inserted “or she” and inserted “or her” in the middle, and added “nor shall such officer’s or employee’s spouse, child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or the spouse of such individuals be qualified for such appointment” at the end, substituted “Three members” for “Four members” at the beginning of the third sentence, deleted “, at least one of whom shall be experienced in labor management relations” at the end of the fourth and fifth sentences, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Four members shall be appointed by the Justices of the Supreme Court, at least one of whom shall be authorized to practice law in this state.”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2017, the single quote at the end of subsection (a) was deleted.

45-7-92.
Oath; expenses of members; meetings generally.

Members of the commission shall take an oath to uphold the Constitution and laws of the United States and of the State of Georgia and shall receive a daily expense allowance and reimbursement for transportation costs as provided for in Code Section 45-7-21. All expenses incurred by the commission in the performance of its duties shall be paid from funds available to the General Assembly. The commission shall meet no more than 15 days in any year.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 103, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 297, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, in the first sentence, substituted “a daily expense allowance and reimbursement for transportation costs as provided for in Code Section 45-7-21” for “a salary of $59.00 per day for each day of service and such expenses and allowances while performing their duties of office as are refundable to state employees” and, in the last sentence, deleted “30 days during the year it is established and no more than” preceding “15 days” and deleted “thereafter” at the end.

45-7-93.
Organizational meeting; employment of staff.

The commission shall meet immediately after a majority of its members have taken the oath of office, shall select from the members one of their members to serve as chairperson, and shall adopt such rules and procedures as may be deemed necessary for the expeditious accomplishment of the obligations of the commission. The commission shall be authorized to employ staff personnel as necessary to accomplish commission objectives.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 103, § 4; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, substituted “members to serve as chairperson” for “number to serve as chairman” in the middle of the first sentence.

45-7-94.
Commission to make comparative study of compensation.

The commission shall make a study of the compensation currently being paid by the state to all constitutional state officers, including members of the General Assembly and all full-time heads of state agencies, authorities, boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, and departments whose compensation is set by the Constitution of Georgia, by law, or by an Act of the General Assembly; and the commission shall compare such compensation with that currently being received by officers and employees serving in comparable positions with the federal government, this state, other states, local governments, and in industry, business, and the professions. In making this comparative study, the commission shall utilize all available data pertaining to prevailing market rates and relating to the costs and standards of living of persons in comparable positions.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 103, § 5; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202, effective May 9, 2017, reenacted this Code section without change.

45-7-95.
Commission to file written report of recommended compensation.

The commission shall file a written report based upon its studies in which a recommended compensation shall be stated for each constitutional state officer, including members of the General Assembly and all full-time heads of state agencies, authorities, boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, and departments whose compensation is set by the Constitution of Georgia, by law, or by Act of the General Assembly. A copy of such report shall be filed with the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Clerk of the House of Representatives, Secretary of the Senate, and legislative counsel. The commission shall file the written report at least 90 days prior to the convening of the General Assembly in regular session at which the general appropriations bill is first considered. The written report of the commission shall be filed, notwithstanding a determination by the commission that no compensation increase or decrease is recommended.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 103, § 6; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, deleted the former subsection (a) designation; in the second sentence, substituted “such report” for “said report” near the beginning, inserted “and” preceding “legislative counsel”, and deleted “, Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals” at the end; substituted “90 days” for “30 days” in the third sentence; and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Whenever a written report of the commission’s compensation plan is filed, a bill shall be prepared suitable for introduction in either the Senate or House of Representatives containing the compensation recommended by the commission; and such bill shall be introduced at the next session of the General Assembly convening after the filing of said written report. Such bill and the compensation contained therein, in order to become effective, shall receive the same number of readings and go through and be subject to the same procedure as required by the Constitution of Georgia for any other bill; provided, however, that the bill relative to the commission’s compensation plan, whether introduced in the House or the Senate, or both, shall be automatically engrossed by both the House and the Senate, and any such bill shall not be changed in either the House or the Senate after its introduction.”.

45-7-96.
Construction of article.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that this article shall not be construed so as to authorize the commission to reduce the compensation of constitutional state officers below that established by the Constitution of Georgia or so as to deprive the General Assembly of plenary power to enact laws affecting compensation in accordance with the Constitution of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 103, § 7; Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 579, § 3-1/HB 202, effective May 9, 2017, reenacted this Code section without change.